North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 7C. Beach Management Plan.

§ 113A-134.11.
Department to compile and evaluate information.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall compile and evaluate information on the current conditions and erosion rates of beaches, on coastal geology, and on storm and erosion hazards for use in developing a State plan and strategy for beach management and restoration. The Department of Environmental Quality shall make this information available to local governments for use in land-use planning.

History.

2000-67, s. 13.9(b); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Beach Nourishment Studies.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.22(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The Division of Coastal Management and the Department of Environmental Quality shall study and provide an executive summary of readily available data and existing studies on the physical and economic, storm mitigation, and public safety benefits of out-of-state coastal storm damage reduction and beach nourishment projects. Specific items benefitted by coastal storm damage reduction shall include, at a minimum, public infrastructure, public property, private property, small businesses, and tourism. The results of the study shall be reported no later than November 1, 2016, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(b) The County Tax Office of each covered county shall work together to identify all privately and publicly owned property island-wide in the county. A covered county includes the Counties of Brunswick, New Hanover, Pender, Onslow, Carteret, Hyde, Dare, and Currituck. Each County Tax Office shall determine whether the mailing/ownership address on the tax record of such property is (i) in the county where such property is located, (ii) in a noncovered county in North Carolina, or (iii) outside the State of North Carolina. Each County Tax Office shall send an electronic list of the property addresses and matched mailing/ownership addresses suitable for electronic sorting no later than November 1, 2016, to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(c) The Department of Commerce shall study and provide an executive summary of readily available economic data related to the 20 coastal counties of the State for the purpose of quantifying the contribution of the coastal economy to the economy of the State as a whole, considering, at a minimum, the benefits of travel and tourism, small businesses, job creation and opportunity, and tax revenues, including property, sales, and income taxes. The Department shall report the results of the study no later than November 1, 2016, to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(d) The Department of Environmental Quality shall include the studies required by each subsection of this section as appendices to the Beach and Inlet Management Plan required by Section 14.6(b)(4) of S.L. 2015-241.”

§ 113A-134.12.
Multiyear beach management and restoration strategy and plan.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop a multiyear beach management and restoration strategy and plan that does all of the following:

Utilizes the data and expertise available in the Divisions of Water Resources, Coastal Management, and Energy, Mineral, and Land Resources.

Identifies the erosion rate at each beach community and estimates the degree of vulnerability to storm and hurricane damage.

Uses the best available geological and geographical information to determine the need for and probable effectiveness of beach nourishment.

Provides for coordination with the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, the North Carolina Department of Transportation, the North Carolina Division of Emergency Management, and other State and federal agencies concerned with beach management issues.

Provides a status report on all U.S. Army Corps of Engineers’ beach protection projects in the planning, construction, or operational stages.

Makes maximum feasible use of suitable sand dredged from navigation channels for beach nourishment to avoid the loss of this resource and to reduce equipment mobilization costs.

Promotes inlet sand bypassing where needed to replicate the natural flow of sand interrupted by inlets.

Provides for geological and environmental assessments to locate suitable materials for beach nourishment.

Considers the regional context of beach communities to determine the most cost-effective approach to beach nourishment.

Provides for and requires adequate public beach access, including access for individuals with a disability.

Recommends priorities for State funding for beach nourishment projects, based on the amount of erosion occurring, the potential damage to property and to the economy, the benefits for recreation and tourism, the adequacy of public access, the availability of local government matching funds, the status of project planning, the adequacy of project engineering, the cost-effectiveness of the project, and the environmental impacts.

Includes recommendations on obtaining the maximum available federal financial assistance for beach nourishment.

Is subject to a public hearing to receive citizen input.

Each plan shall be as complete as resources and available information allow.

History.

2000-67, s. 13.9(c), (d); 2012-143, s. 1(f); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-10, s. 4.9; 2018-142, s. 15.